print/tex/TeX3.14/contrib/tex/hyphen/hyphen.french.tex
% The FPlain TeX hyphenation tables [NOT TO BE CHANGED IN ANY WAY!]            
\patterns{ % just type <return> if you're not using INITEX                     
1ba                                                                            
1bS                                                                            
1be                                                                            
1bZ                                                                            
1bY                                                                            
1b                                                                             
1bi                                                                            
1bä                                                                            
1bo                                                                            
1b4                                                                            
1bu                                                                            
1b÷                                                                            
1by                                                                            
4bes.                                                                          
1b2l                                                                           
4ble.                                                                          
4bles.                                                                         
1b2r                                                                           
4bre.                                                                          
4bres.                                                                         
1ca                                                                            
1cS                                                                            
1ce                                                                            
1cZ                                                                            
1cY                                                                            
1c                                                                             
1ci                                                                            
1cä                                                                            
1co                                                                            
1c4                                                                            
1cu                                                                            
1c÷                                                                            
1cy                                                                            
1c7                                                                            
4ces.                                                                          
1c2h                                                                           
4che.                                                                          
4ches.                                                                         
2chb                                                                           
2chg                                                                           
2chm                                                                           
2chn                                                                           
2chp                                                                           
2chs                                                                           
2cht                                                                           
2chw                                                                           
.ch4                                                                           
ch2l                                                                           
4chle.                                                                         
4chles.                                                                        
ch2r                                                                           
4chre.                                                                         
4chres.                                                                        
1c2k                                                                           
4cke                                                                           
4ckes.                                                                         
2ckb                                                                           
2ckf                                                                           
2ckg                                                                           
2ck3h                                                                          
2ckp                                                                           
2cks                                                                           
2ckt                                                                           
1c2l                                                                           
4cle                                                                           
4cles                                                                          
1c2r                                                                           
4cre.                                                                          
4cres.                                                                         
1X                                                                             
1da                                                                            
1dS                                                                            
1de                                                                            
1dZ                                                                            
1dY                                                                            
1d                                                                             
1di                                                                            
1dä                                                                            
1do                                                                            
1d4                                                                            
1du                                                                            
1d÷                                                                            
1dy                                                                            
4des.                                                                          
d1d2h                                                                          
1d2r                                                                           
4dre.                                                                          
4dres.                                                                         
1fa                                                                            
1fS                                                                            
1fe                                                                            
1Z                                                                             
1fY                                                                            
1f                                                                             
1fi                                                                            
1fä                                                                            
1fo                                                                            
1f4                                                                            
1fu                                                                            
1f÷                                                                            
1fy                                                                            
4fes.                                                                          
1f2l                                                                           
4fle.                                                                          
4fles.                                                                         
1f2r                                                                           
4fre.                                                                          
4fres.                                                                         
1ga                                                                            
1gS                                                                            
1ge                                                                            
1gZ                                                                            
1gY                                                                            
1g                                                                             
1gi                                                                            
1gä                                                                            
1go                                                                            
1g4                                                                            
1gu                                                                            
1g÷                                                                            
1gy                                                                            
4ges                                                                           
4gue                                                                           
4gues.                                                                         
1g2ha                                                                          
1g2he                                                                          
1g2hi                                                                          
1g2ho                                                                          
1g2hy                                                                          
1g2l                                                                           
4gle.                                                                          
4gles                                                                          
1g2n                                                                           
4gne.                                                                          
4gnes.                                                                         
1g2r                                                                           
4gre.                                                                          
4gres.                                                                         
1ha                                                                            
1hS                                                                            
1he                                                                            
1hZ                                                                            
1hY                                                                            
1h                                                                             
1hi                                                                            
1hä                                                                            
1ho                                                                            
1h4                                                                            
